Darbas/source/generic/lthyphen/rhyphen.tex
z5gna
zg1nu
zi5dv
2z1inf
zi6ni
2z1int
zi6ono
3zis
2z1k
z1l
6z1m
z6ms
2zna.
6zna,
z1ne
z1ni
z1no
z1nu
2zny
5zo.
zo1b
zo1d2r
zok2
z1oks
1zol
zo5m6
zo1w
z1org
zo1rv
zo1s2
zo1z2
z1p
z1ra
z2rak
z2raq
z5rez
5zri
z1rod
6z1ru
z1r,
2z1s
z1t
1zu
2z1u2s
zv2
z5vet
zve2t3v
z1vk
z6von
1zvu
z1v,
z1x
6z1*
z1z
z-,5v
5z/)
z1q
z1(
-e2
-em5n
-1u
-1,2
-1)
-)6s
-)6t
/1b
/1de
/1di
/do5
/dos6
/5dr
/1d*
/5d/
/5d,
/5fe
/2f1r
/1g
/1h
/ho2
/1k
/2k1lo
/k5n
/1l
/1m
/6mr
/6ms
/1n
/2nul
/1p
/1w
/6wa
/6we
/6wu
/1s
/2sn
/2sti
/s1tin
/1t
/ti5s
/1va
/1ve
/1vi
/1x
/6xk
/1*
/1z
/6zn
/6z,.
/5,s
/,v5l
/1q
/1(
,1a
,1ba
,1be
,1bi
,1bo
,1bu
,1by
,1b/e
,1b/i
,1b/,
,1b/)
,1b,
,1b)
,1ca
,1ce
,1ci
,1co
,1cu
,1da
,1de
,1di
,1do
,1du
,1dy
,1d/e
,1d/i
,1d/,
,1d/)
,1d,
,1d)
,1e
,1fa
,1fe
,1fi
,1fo
,1fu
,1f/e
,1f/i
,1f/,
,1f/)
,1f,
,1f)
,1ga
,1ge
,1gi
,g1l
,g5n
,1go
,1gu
,1gy
,1g/e
,1g/i
,1g/,
,1g/)
,1g,
,1g)
,1ha
,1he
,1hi
,1ho
,1hu
,1hy
,1h/e
,1h/i
,1h/,
,1h/)
,1h,
,1h)
,1i
,1ka
,1ke
,1ki
,k1n
,1ko
,1ku
,1ky
,1k/e
,1k/i
,1k/,
,1k/)
,1k,
,1k)
,1la
,1le
,1li
,1lo
,1lu
,1ly
,1l/e
,1l/i
,1l/,
,1l/)
,1l,
,1l)
,1ma
,1me
,1mi
,1mo
,1mu
,1my
,1m/e
,1m/i
,1m/,
,1m/)
,1m,
,1m)
,1na
,1ne
,1ni
,1no
,1nu
,1ny
,1n/e
,1n/i
,1n/,
,1n/)
,1n,
,1n)
,1o2
,1pa
,1pe
,1pi
,1po
,1pu
,1py
,1p/e
,1p/i
,1p/,
,1p/)
,1p,
,1p)
,1wa
,1we
,1wi
,1wo
,1wu
,1w/e
,1w/i
,1w/,
,1w/)
,1ra
,1re
,1ri
,1ro
,1ru
,1ry
,1r/e
,1r/i
,1r/,
,1r/)
,1r,
,1r)
,1sa
,1se
,1si
,s1k
,1so
,s6t
,1sta
,1ste
,1sti
,1sto
,5str
,1stu
,1sty
,1st/e
,1st/i
,1st/,
,1st/)
,1st,
,1st)
,1su
,1sy
,1s/e
,1s/i
,1s/,
,1s/)
,1s,
,1s)
,1ta
,1te
,5ti
,1to
,5tr
,1tu
,t1v
,1ty
,1t/e
,1t/i
,1t/,
,1t/)
,1t,
,1t)
,1u
,1va
,1ve
1,1vi
,2vl
,1vo
,1vu
,1vy
,1v/e
,1v/i
,1v/,
,1v/)
,1v,
,1v)
,1xa
,1xe
,1xi
,1xo
,1xu
,1x/e
,1x/i
,1x/,
,1x/)
,1*a
,1*e
,1*i
,1*o
,1*u
,1*/e
,1*/i
,1*/,
,1*/)
,1*,
,1*)
,1y
,1za
,1ze
,1zi
,1zo
,1zu
,z1v
,1zy
,1z/e
,1z/i
,1z/,
,1z/)
,1z,
,1z)
,1,
,1qa
,1qe
,1qi
,1qu
,1q/e
,1q/i
,1q/,
,1q/)
,1(
,1)
5qan
qar3t
qast1v
qeh1l
1qel
1qh
3qi+
1qik
1qiv
qi6,h
6q1k
q1la
1qle
6q5leg
6q5le*
6q1m
q1n
1qo
q1p
q1s
1qt
q1tel
2qtm
q1v
q1x
1q,
q1q
(1a
(6c
(2d
(1e
(6f
(1i
1(2k
(5ka
(5ke
(ks1
(5ly
(l/5
(1l,
(1n/
(1o
(5ri
(ro1
(s1k
(s5m
(s2pa
(1u
(6v
(5x
(1y
(5zi
(1,
(1(
(1)
)1a
)1b
)1ba
)1be
)1bi
)1bo
)1bu
)1by
)1b/e
)1b/i
)1b/,
)1b/)
)1b,
)1b)
)1ca
)1ce
)1ci
)1co
)1cu
)1da
)1de
)1di
)1do
)1du
)d1*
)1dy
)1d/e
)1d/i
)1d/,
)1d/)
)1d,
)1d)
)1e
)1fa
)1fe
)1fi
)1fo
)1fu
)1f/e
)1f/i
)1f/,
)1f/)
)1f,
)1f)
)1ga
)1ge
)1gi
)g1n
)1go
)1gu
)1gy
)1g/e
)1g/i
)1g/,
)1g/)
)1g,
)1g)
)1ha
)1he
)1hi
)1ho
)1hu
)1hy
)1h/e
)1h/i
)1h/,
)1h/)
)1h,
)1h)
)1i
)+2d1
)+do6
)1ka
)1ke
)1ki
)k1n
)1ko
)1ku
)1ky
)k1z
)1k/e
)1k/i
)1k/,
)1k/)
)1k,
)1k)
)1la
)1le
)2li
)1lo
)1lu
)1ly
)1l/e
)1l/i
)1l/,
)1l/)
)1l,
)1l)
2)m
)1ma
)1me
)1mi
)mini5
)1mo
)1mu
)1my
)1m/e
)1m/i
)1m/,
)1m/)
)1m,
)1m)
)1na
)1ne
)1ni
)1no
)1nu
)1ny
)1n/e
)1n/i
)1n/,
)1n/)
)1n,
)1n)
)1o
)1pa
)1pe
)1pi
)1po
)p5t
)1pu
)1py
)1p/e
)1p/i
)1p/,
)1p/)
)1p,
)1p)
)5w
)1wa
)1we
)1wi
)1wo
)1wu
)1w/e
)1w/i
)1w/,
)1w/)
)1ra
)1re
)1ri
)1ro
)1ru
)1ry
)1r/e
)1r/i
)1r/,
)1r/)
)1r,
)1r)
)1sa
)1se
)1si
)s5k
)1so
)1sta
)1ste
)1sti
)1sto
)1str
)1stu
)1sty
)1st/e
)1st/i
)1st/,
)1st/)
)1st,
)1st)
)1su
)1sy
)1s/e
)1s/i
)1s/,
)1s/)
)1s,
)1s)
)1ta
)1te
)1ti
)1to
)1tu
)1ty
)1t/e
)1t/i
)1t/,
)1t/)
)1t,
)1t)
)1u
)1va
)1ve
)1vi
)1vo
)1vu
)1vy
)1v/e
)1v/i
)1v/,
)1v/)
)1v,
)1v)
)1xa
)1xe
)1xi
)1xo
)1xu
)1x/e
)1x/i
)1x/,
)1x/)
)1*a
)1*e
)1*i
)1*o
)1*u
)1*/e
)1*/i
)1*/,
)1*/)
)1*,
)1*)
)1y
)1za
)1ze
)1zi
)1zo
)1zu
)1zy
)1z/e
)1z/i
)1z/,
)1z/)
)1z,
)1z)
)1,
}}
